Illinois, session 104th, SB2702.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grade A Pasteurized Milk and Milk Products 5Act is amended by changing Section 8 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 635/8)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 2208)7    Sec. 8. After the effective date of this Act, no person 8shall sell or distribute, offer to sell or distribute any milk 9or milk product for human use or consumption unless such milk 10or milk product has been pasteurized and has been produced and 11processed in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated 12by the Department.13    The term "sell or distribute for use or consumption" means 14to sell or distribute to a person for human use or consumption 15and not for processing or resale in any form.16    The pasteurization requirement of this Section shall not 17be applicable to milk produced in accordance with Department 18rules and regulations if: sold or distributed on the premises 19of the dairy farm20        (1) the milk is sold or distributed directly to the 21    final consumer on the premises of the dairy farm where it 22    was produced; or23        (2) the milk is sold or distributed directly to the   SB2702- 2 -LRB104 15613 BDA 28780 b1    final consumer at an off-farm location or through 2    delivery, provided that the producer holds a raw milk 3    permit issued by the Department and complies with all 4    sanitary, labeling, recordkeeping, and transportation 5    requirements established by the Department to ensure 6    consumer safety.7(Source: P.A. 83-102.)